Washington statutes.
RCW 13.80.010

Purpose.

The learning and life skills grant program is created. The purpose of the program is to provide services, to the extent funds are appropriated, for court-involved youth under the age of twenty-one to help the youth attain the necessary life skills and educational skills to obtain a certificate of educational competency, obtain employment, return to a school program, or enter a postsecondary education or job-training program.

[ 1994 c 152 s 1.]